Hawaii statutes.
[§454M-2.5] Unlicensed foreclosure actions voided. Any action taken in connection with a mortgage foreclosure under
chapter 667 by a nonexempt person who engages in the business of mortgage
servicing without a license as provided in this chapter shall be void for
purposes of chapter 667. [L 2011, c 48, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next